Nevada, session 83, SB288.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 472.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
472.040 1. The State Forester Firewarden shall:
(a) Supervise or coordinate all forestry, rangeland and watershed
work on state-owned and privately owned lands, including fire
control, in Nevada, working with federal agencies, private
associations, counties, towns, cities or private persons.
(b) Administer all fire control laws and all forestry laws in
Nevada outside of townsite boundaries, and perform any other
duties designated by the Director of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources or by state law.
(c) Assist and encourage county or local fire protection districts
to create legally constituted fire protection districts where they are
needed and offer guidance and advice in their operation.
(d) Purchase communication equipment which can use the
microwave channels of the state communications system and store
this equipment in regional locations for use in emergencies.
(e) Administer money appropriated and grants awarded for fire
prevention, fire control and the education of firefighters and award
grants of money for those purposes to fire departments and
educational institutions in this State.
(f) Determine the amount of wages that must be paid to
offenders who participate in conservation camps and who perform
work relating to fire fighting and other work projects of
conservation camps.
(g) Cooperate with the State Fire Marshal in the enforcement of
all laws and the adoption of regulations relating to the prevention of
fire through the management of vegetation in this State.
(h) Ensure that any adopted regulations are consistent with those
of fire protection districts created pursuant to chapter 318 or 474 of
NRS.
(i) Upon the request of the State Engineer, review a plan
submitted with an application for the issuance of a temporary permit
pursuant to NRS 533.436.
-
*SB288*

– 3 –
(j) Work collaboratively with and provide technical assistance to
federal, state and local agencies and property owners to:
(1) Identify and mitigate the risks of wildfire to life, property
and ecosystems;
(2) Restore and maintain landscape resiliency;
(3) Create and maintain fire-adapted communities and
ignition-resistant communities; and
(4) Improve and support safe and effective responses to
wildfire.
(k) Designate by regulation the boundaries of each area in this
State with a high risk of fire hazards.
2. The State Forester Firewarden in carrying out the provisions
of this chapter may:
(a) Appoint paid foresters and firewardens to enforce the
provisions of the laws of this State respecting forest, rangeland and
watershed management or the protection of lands from fire, subject
to the approval of the board of county commissioners of each county
concerned.
(b) Appoint suitable citizen-wardens. Citizen-wardens serve
voluntarily except that they may receive compensation when an
emergency is declared by the State Forester Firewarden.
(c) Appoint, upon the recommendation of the appropriate federal
officials, resident officers of the United States Forest Service and
the United States Bureau of Land Management as voluntary
firewardens. Voluntary firewardens are not entitled to compensation
for their services.
(d) Appoint certain paid foresters or firewardens to be arson
investigators.
(e) Employ, with the consent of the Director of the State
Department of Conservation and Natural Resources, clerical
assistance, county and district coordinators, patrol officers,
firefighters, and other employees as needed, and expend such sums
as may be necessarily incurred for this purpose.
(f) Purchase, or acquire by donation, supplies, material,
equipment and improvements necessary for fire protection, fire
prevention and forest, rangeland and watershed management,
including, without limitation, cameras or other equipment necessary
for the early warning or detection of wildfires.
(g) With the approval of the Director of the State Department of
Conservation and Natural Resources and the State Board of
Examiners, purchase or accept the donation of real property to be
used for lookout sites and for other administrative, experimental or
demonstration purposes. No real property may be purchased or
accepted unless an examination of the title shows the property to be
free from encumbrances, with title vested in the grantor. The title to
-
*SB288*

– 4 –
the real property must be examined and approved by the Attorney
General.
(h) Expend any money appropriated by the State to the Division
of Forestry of the State Department of Conservation and Natural
Resources for paying expenses incurred in fighting fires or in
emergencies which threaten human life.
3. The State Forester Firewarden, in carrying out the powers
and duties granted in this section, is subject to administrative
supervision by the Director of the State Department of Conservation
and Natural Resources.
Sec. 2. NRS 113.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
113.120 The Real Estate Division of the Department of
Business and Industry shall adopt regulations prescribing the format
and contents of a form for disclosing the condition of residential
property offered for sale. The regulations must ensure that the form:
1. Provides for an evaluation of the condition of any electrical,
heating, cooling, plumbing and sewer systems on the property, and
of the condition of any other aspects of the property which affect its
use or value, and allows the seller of the property to indicate
whether or not each of those systems and other aspects of the
property has a defect of which the seller is aware.
2. Requires the seller of the property to indicate whether the
property is located in an area designated by the State Forester
Firewarden pursuant to section 1 of this act as an area with a high
risk of fire hazards.
3. Provides notice:
(a) Of the provisions of NRS 113.140 and subsection 5 of
NRS 113.150.
(b) That the disclosures set forth in the form are made by the
seller and not by the seller’s agent.
(c) That the seller’s agent, and the agent of the purchaser or
potential purchaser of the residential property, may reveal the
completed form and its contents to any purchaser or potential
purchaser of the residential property.
Sec. 3. Chapter 278 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
If a person submits an application for any building permit for
the construction of a building or other structure on a site located
within an area designated by the State Forester Firewarden
pursuant to section 1 of this act as an area with a high risk of fire
hazards, the governing body responsible for issuing such permits
shall notify the applicant that the site for which the building
permit is sought is located within an area designated by the State
Forester Firewarden pursuant to section 1 of this act as an area
with a high risk of fire hazards.
-
*SB288*

– 5 –
Sec. 4. NRS 278.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.010 As used in NRS 278.010 to 278.630, inclusive, and
section 3 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 278.0103 to 278.0195, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 5. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 4, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB288*